Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1752.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 121.2. Keystone Exam Alternative Feasibility Study.--(a) The secretary shall contract for an independent study to determine whether the ACT and SAT may be administered in lieu of ACT, SAT OR SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENTS MAY REPLACE the current Statewide, standardized Keystone Exams in literature, algebra I and biology for high school students consistent with Federal requirements under 20 U.S.C. § 6311(b) (2)(H) 6311(B) (relating to state plans). <--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 (b) The secretary shall submit, within one year after the effective date of this subsection, a report containing the results of the study and recommendations to the Governor, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and , the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives AND THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION . The study shall include the following: (1) An evaluation of the degree to which the ACT and SAT , SAT AND SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENTS align with Pennsylvania core academic standards and are suitable for use in lieu of the Statewide Keystone Exams in literature, algebra I and biology.(2) Studies, research and analyses required to determine the extent to which the ACT and SAT test results , SAT AND SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENTS provide comparable, valid and reliable data on student achievement as compared to the Keystone Exams for all students and for each subgroup of students.(3) A determination of whether the ACT and SAT , SAT AND SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENTS provide testing accommodations that permit students with disabilities and English learners the opportunity to participate in each assessment and receive comparable benefits.(4) Analyses to determine whether the ACT and SAT , SAT AND SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENTS provide unbiased, rational and consistent differentiation among schools within the Commonwealth's accountability system.(5) An evaluation to determine whether the ACT and SAT , SAT AND SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENTS meet the criteria for technical quality that all Statewide assessments must meet for Federal assessment peer review.(6) AN ESTIMATE OF THE NUMBER OF ADDITIONAL STUDENTS WHO 20250HB1752PN3064 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WOULD BE TAKING THE ACT, SAT AND SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENTS COMPARED TO CURRENT KEYSTONE EXAM PARTICIPATION RATES.(7) AN EXAMINATION OF THE POTENTIAL ANNUAL COST TO THE COMMONWEALTH OF ADMINISTERING THE ACT, SAT AND SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENTS FOR PURPOSES OF COMPLIANCE WITH THE TESTING AND ACCOUNTABILITY REQUIREMENTS OF THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION ACT OF 1965 (PUBLIC LAW 89-10, 20 U.S.C. § 6301 ET SEQ.), AS AMENDED BY THE EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT (PUBLIC LAW 114-95, 129 STAT. 1802). THE EXAMINATION SHALL INCLUDE AN ANALYSIS OF ANNUAL COSTS INCURRED BY STATES USING THE ACT OR SAT AND HOW COSTS HAVE CHANGED OVER TIME.(8) A SUMMARY OF HOW THE DEPARTMENT AND SCHOOL ENTITIES WOULD TRANSITION TO THE USE OF NEW ASSESSMENTS FOR PURPOSES OF COMPLIANCE WITH THE TESTING AND ACCOUNTABILITY REQUIREMENTS OF THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION ACT OF 1965, AS AMENDED BY THE EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT, INCLUDING A PROPOSED TIMELINE AND AN ESTIMATE OF TRANSITION COSTS.(9) A SUMMARY AND COMPARISON OF TESTING PROCEDURES FOR THE ACT, SAT AND SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENTS, INCLUDING WHEN TESTS ARE PROCTORED AND TIMELINES FOR THE RELEASE OF RESULTS.(10) A SUMMARY AND COMPARISON OF THE EXISTING RESEARCH ON THE CORRELATION BETWEEN PERFORMANCE ON THE ACT, SAT AND SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENTS AND PERFORMANCE ON THE KEYSTONE EXAMS.(11) A LISTING OF THE LANGUAGES IN WHICH THE ACT, SAT AND SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENTS ARE AVAILABLE.(12) AN ANALYSIS AND COMPARISON OF THOSE ASSESSMENTS THAT USE A COMPARATIVE-PERCENTILE MEASURE OF STUDENT PERFORMANCE AND THOSE ASSESSMENTS THAT USE A PROFICIENCY DETERMINATION TO MEASURE STUDENT PERFORMANCE.(13) AN ANALYSIS OF THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE ACT, SAT AND 20250HB1752PN3064 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENT FOR PURPOSES OF AGGREGATE STUDENT COMPARISON.(14) A DESCRIPTION OF HOW THE DEPARTMENT WOULD USE ACT, SAT OR SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENT RESULTS IN AREAS SUCH AS EDUCATOR EVALUATION, FUTURE-READY INDEX AND IDENTIFICATION OF LOW-PERFORMING SCHOOLS.(15) RECOMMENDED AMENDMENTS TO STATE LAW AND REGULATIONS RELATED TO STATEWIDE ACADEMIC STANDARDS, ASSESSMENTS AND GRADUATION REQUIREMENTS THAT WOULD BE NECESSARY FOR ADMINISTRATION OF THE ACT, SAT AND SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENTS IN LIEU OF THE CURRENT KEYSTONE EXAMS.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"ACT." A standardized test for the assessment of college readiness administered by ACT."DEPARTMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH."FUTURE-READY INDEX." THE SCHOOL PROGRESS REPORT DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND POSTED ANNUALLY ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE."Keystone Exam." An assessment developed or caused to be developed by the Department of Education DEPARTMENT under 22 Pa. Code § 4.51b(a) (relating to Keystone Exams)."SAT." A standardized test for the assessment of college readiness administered by the College Board."Secretary." The Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth."SMARTER BALANCED ASSESSMENTS." A SYSTEM OF COMPUTER-BASED TESTS FOR ENGLISH LANGUAGE ARTS, LITERACY AND MATHEMATICS, ALIGNED WITH THE COMMON CORE STATE STANDARDS, DESIGNED TO 20250HB1752PN3064 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MEASURE COLLEGE AND CAREER READINESS IN GRADES THREE THROUGH EIGHT AND ELEVEN.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1752PN3064 - 5 - 123